New Jersey, session 222, A1656.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Backlight, uplight, and glare rating," or "BUG rating" means a rating assigned to a luminaire, using criteria developed by the Illuminating Engineering Society, where the light emitted behind the desired direction of illumination ("backlight"), upward ("uplight"), and in a slant angle causing glare ("glare") from the luminaire are rated from 0 (desirable) to 5 (worst). "Energy conservation" means the reduction of energy costs and resources by use of methods including, but not limited to, the use of light fixtures with the lowest feasible wattage or a photo-sensitive, motion detecting, or timer switch. "Full cutoff fixture" means a luminaire whose luminous intensity in candelas at or above an angle of 90 degrees above nadir is zero and the luminous intensity, in candelas, at or above a vertical angle of 80 degrees above nadir does not numerically exceed two percent of the luminous flux of the lamp or lamps in the luminaire. "Fully shielded luminaire" means a luminaire that allows no direct light emissions above a horizontal plane through the lowest light-emitting part of the luminaire. "Glare" means direct light emitting from a luminaire that is significantly greater than luminance to which the eyes are adapted, and which causes reduced vision or momentary blindness. "Illuminance" means the unit measure of light at a surface. "Lamp" means the component of a luminaire that produces the specific form of radiant energy that is observed as light. "Light trespass" means light emitted by a luminaire that shines beyond the boundaries of the property on which the luminaire is located. "Lumen" means an international standard unit of luminous flux representing the quantity of visible light output. "Luminaire" means the complete lighting unit fixture consisting of a lamp, or lamps and ballasts, together with the parts designed to distribute light, including, but not limited to, a reflector, lens, and diffuser, to position and protect the lamps, and to connect the lamps to the power supply. "Luminous flux" means the measure of the perceived power of the light in lumens. "Outdoor lighting fixture" means any type of fixed or movable lighting equipment that is designed or used for illumination outdoors. "Outdoor lighting fixture" shall not include lighting equipment that is required by law to be installed on motor vehicles, or lighting required for the safe operation of aircraft or installed at an aviation facility. "Project" means the acquisition, construction, improvement, reconstruction, or repair of all or part of any building, facility, structure, or real property. "State agency" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, any division, board, bureau, office, commission, or other instrumentality created by a principal department, and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality, or agency established by law. 2.   a. Commencing on the effective date of this act, an outdoor lighting fixture installed or replaced by, or on behalf of, a State agency, or as part of a project that receives funds from a State agency, shall comply with the following specifications: (1) the luminaire shall be a fully shielded luminaire, be equipped with a full cutoff fixture, emit no more than two percent of its total lumen output above 80 degrees from nadir, and have a BUG rating of U0; (2) the outdoor lighting fixture shall emit only as much light as necessary for the intended purpose and shall not exceed the minimum illuminance level recommended for that purpose by the Illuminating Engineering Society of North America or the Federal Highway Administration; (3) an outdoor lighting fixture used to illuminate sports fields shall  be turned off when not in use; (4) full consideration has been given to energy conservation, and reducing glare, minimizing light trespass and light pollution, and preserving the natural night environment and public health; (5) the correlated color temperature of an outdoor lighting fixture shall be no more than 2,700 Kelvin, except that: (a) a luminaire within direct line-of-sight to areas seaward of a frontal dune or within close proximity to a nature preserve shall emit no radiant energy with a wavelength of less than 560 nanometers; (b) the maximum correlated color temperature for outdoor sports lighting shall be the lowest possible for the sport, class of play, and viewing audience, but shall not exceed 4,200 Kelvin; and (c) luminaires used specifically for the decoration of facades or landscapes may have a correlated color temperature in excess of 2,700 Kelvin; and (6) the outdoor lighting fixture shall use a motion sensor device that automatically turns on, dims, or turns off the light, as appropriate. b. The provisions of subsection a. of this section shall not apply in the following circumstances: (1)  the outdoor lighting fixture is used on a temporary basis because emergency personnel require additional illumination for emergency procedures; (2)  the outdoor lighting fixture is used on a temporary basis for nighttime work; (3)  a compelling safety interest exists that cannot be addressed by another method; or (4)  the outdoor lighting fixture is located in a high-security area, as designated by the New Jersey Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness and the New Jersey State Police. c. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, in the case of outdoor lighting fixtures installed along any roadway in the State, the Department of Transportation shall assess whether the purpose of the outdoor lighting fixture can be achieved by the installation of reflective road markers, lines, warning or informational signs, or other effective passive methods in lieu of the installation of outdoor lighting fixtures. d. The Division of Property Management and Construction shall collaborate with the Board of Public Utilities to ensure uniformity in lighting specifications for State-owned buildings and any funding and rebates available to State-owned buildings under the State Facilities Initiative. e.  The State Treasurer shall provide guidance to every State agency concerning the requirements of this act. 3.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, or rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Purchase and Property in the Department of the Treasury, the Director of the Division of Property Management and Construction in the Department of the Treasury, or any State agency having authority to contract for the purchase of goods or services, shall comply with the requirements of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.